District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.213

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person may use the words or terms “steam engineer,” “licensed steam engineer,” “steam operating engineer,” “licensed steam operating engineer,” “operating engineer,” or “licensed operating engineer” to imply that the person is authorized to perform the services of a steam or other operating engineer in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.213.